Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-523
Judgments; installment payments; default; suspend license or registration.

In the event the judgment debtor fails to pay an installment as specified by such order, the department, upon notice of such default, shall forthwith suspend the license, registration or nonresident's operating privilege of the judgment debtor until such judgment is satisfied, as provided in sections 60-501 to 60-569.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 23, p. 492.